Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 56
AUCTIONEERS OF LIVESTOCK

Section

35-56-101. Stock register.

Any person licensed in this state to keep an auction, where horses, mules, or cattle are sold at auction, shall maintain a book called a stock register, in which he shall describe minutely every animal he offers for sale.

Source:

R.S.

p. 70, § 1.

G.L.

§ 34.

G.S.

§ 87.

R.S. 08:

§ 255.

C.L.

§ 4731.

CSA:

C. 15, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 8-12-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-12-1.

35-56-102. Contents of register.

In such register shall be recorded the person's name who brings forward such animal for sale, whether or not he is the owner of the same, and if not the owner, the name of the owner, with his residence; also, the color, brand or marks, size, and age, as near as may be, of the animal so offered for sale.

Source:

R.S.

p. 70, § 2.

G.L.

§ 35.

G.S.

§ 88.

R.S. 08:

§ 256.

C.L.

§ 4732.

CSA:

C. 15, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 8-12-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-12-2.

35-56-103. Registration fee.

The keeper of such auction shall be entitled to charge and receive for the registering of each animal so entered in his register, before he offers the same for sale, the sum of twenty-five cents. All stock registers shall be open for inspection and reference to any person who may wish to examine the same, and shall be evidence in any court where the trial of the right of property may be had.

Source:

R.S.

p. 70, § 3.

G.L.

§ 36.

G.S.

§ 89.

R.S. 08:

§ 257.

C.L.

§ 4733.

CSA:

C. 15, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 8-12-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-12-3.

35-56-104. Penalty.

Any person who offers for sale at auction any animal named in section 35-56-101, without first complying with the requirements of this article 56 as to registration, commits a civil infraction and the fine must be paid into the county treasury for the use of the county.

Source:

R.S.

p. 70, § 4.

G.L.

§ 37.

G.S.

§ 90.

R.S. 08:

§ 258.

C.L.

§ 4734.

CSA:

C. 15, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 8-12-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-12-4.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3288, § 663, effective March 1, 2022.

35-56-105. Record kept by auctioneers.

All auctioneers, commission merchants, and other persons who keep a place or stand for publicly vending horses, mules, and horned cattle, or any of them, in a book kept for that purpose, shall keep a true and faithful record of all the animals purchased or sold by them, or under their control, which record shall contain a brief description of the animal, including its age, value, marks, brands, and date of purchase and sale, and the name and residence of the seller and purchaser in each case.

Source:

R.S.

p. 70, § 5.

G.L.

§ 38.

G.S.

§ 91.

R.S. 08:

§ 259.

C.L.

§ 4735.

CSA:

C. 15, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 8-12-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-12-5.

35-56-106. Record open to inspection.

The record provided for in section 35-56-105 shall be open to the inspection of all persons during the ordinary business hours of the day.

Source:

R.S.

p. 70, § 6.

G.L.

§ 39.

G.S.

§ 92.

R.S. 08:

§ 260.

C.L.

§ 4736.

CSA:

C. 15, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 8-12-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-12-6.

35-56-107. Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this article 56 commits a civil infraction.

Source:

R.S.

p. 70, § 7.

G.L.

§ 40.

G.S.

§ 93.

R.S. 08:

§ 261.

C.L.

§ 4737.

CSA:

C. 15, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 8-12-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-12-7.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3288, § 664, effective March 1, 2022.

35-56-108. Disposition of fines.

All fines recovered under the provisions of this article shall be paid into the county treasury of the proper county, and appeals shall be allowed to the district court as in civil cases.

Source:

R.S.

p. 71, § 8.

G.L.

§ 41.

G.S.

§ 94.

R.S. 08:

§ 262.

C.L.

§ 4738.

CSA:

C. 15, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 8-12-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-12-8.